Utah statutes.
13-5-12.   Sales exempt from chapter.

(1)  The provisions of this chapter do not apply to any sale made:

(a)  in closing out in good faith the owner's stock or any part thereof for the purpose of discontinuing his trade in any such stock or commodity, and in the case of the sale of seasonal goods, or to the bona fide sale of perishable goods to prevent loss to the vendor by spoilage or depreciation; provided, prior notice is given to the public thereof;

(b)  when the goods are damaged or deteriorated in quality, and prior notice is given to the public thereof;

(c)  by an officer acting under the orders of any court;

(d)  in an endeavor made in good faith to meet the legal prices of a competitor as herein defined selling the same article, product or commodity in the same locality or trade area;

(e)  by manufacturers, producers, brokers or wholesale distributors meeting in good faith prices established by interstate competition regardless of cost; provided, such prices are available to all persons buying on like terms and conditions in the same locality and vicinity.

(2)  Any person, who performs work upon, renovates, alters or improves any personal property belonging to another person, except necessary repairs due to damage in transit, shall be construed to be a vendor within the meaning of this chapter.



Amended by Chapter 378, 2010 General Session

